Utah statutes.
59-19-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Controlled substance" means any drug or substance, whether real or
counterfeit, as defined in Section 58-37-2, that is held, possessed,
transported, transferred, sold, or offered to be sold in violation of Utah
laws.  It does not include marihuana.
(2)  "Dealer" means a person who, in violation of Utah law, manufactures,
produces, ships, transports, or imports into Utah or in any manner acquires or
possesses more than 42-1/2 grams of marihuana, or seven or more grams of any
controlled substance, or 10 or more dosage units of any controlled substance
which is not sold by weight.
(3)  "Marihuana" means any marihuana, whether real or counterfeit, as defined
in Section 58-37-2, that is held, possessed, transported, transferred, sold,
or offered to be sold in violation of Utah laws.
